Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

§201B-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Agency" means any agency,
department, authority, board, commission, the University of Hawaii, or any
other unit of the State or its political subdivisions.

"Authority" means the Hawaii tourism
authority established in section 201B-2.

"Board" means the board of directors
of the Hawaii tourism authority established in section 201B-2, and any
successor thereto.

"Convention center facility" or
"convention center" means any combination of land, buildings, and
improvements thereon, acquired or developed by the State, and includes
exhibition halls, meeting rooms, a plenary session hall, and support space that
reflect a Hawaiian sense of place; any other structure or facility required or
useful for the operation of a convention center, including commercial, office,
community service, parking, garage, and other supporting service structures;
and, all necessary, useful, and related equipment, furnishings, and
appurtenances.

"Public agency" means any office,
department, board, commission, bureau, division, public corporation agency, or
instrumentality of the federal, state, or county government. [L 1998, c 156, pt
of §2; am L 2002, c 253, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next